Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 111. Monuments, Observances, Service Records, Histories

§ 3901.
Soldiers’ monuments and records.

A town may instruct the selectboard to erect a building or monument to the memory of citizens of such town who were in the military or naval service during any wars in which the United States has been engaged and may appropriate sufficient money for that purpose, and may issue its notes or bonds extending over a period that shall not exceed five years to cover the expense of the same. Such town may also instruct the selectboard to have inscribed upon such monument or upon or within such buildings the names of such persons credited to such town by the State, or federal authorities, who entered the service of the United States during such wars and died while in such service or were honorably discharged.

§ 3902.
Rooms for use of veterans’ organizations.

A town may appropriate the necessary funds to pay the rentals of rooms for the use of organizations of veterans of wars of the United States.

§ 3903.
Military records.

A town may appoint a person, who need not be a resident of the town, to prepare a military record at the expense of the town, which shall contain the name of every person in the U.S. Armed Forces furnished by the town during any wars or military enterprises in which the United States has been engaged with the following statistics, so far as applicable to each case: age at the time of enlistment or induction; birthplace; date of enlistment; date of muster into the service of the United States; rank; promotions; reenlistment; date and cause of discharge; date of pension and amount; date and cause of death; date, place, and nature of wounds; bounty received from the town and bounty received from individuals; and any other pertinent information.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 269.

§ 3904.
Printing and sale of records.

A town may order such records printed and kept for sale at a price not to exceed an advance of 20 percent of the cost of publication.

§ 3905.
Certified copy for town clerk’s office.

A copy officially certified by the compiler of the record shall be kept in the office of the town clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 53

, § 7.

§ 3906.
Town histories.

At its annual meeting, a town may authorize the selectboard to contract with some person to prepare and publish the history of the town, under such regulations as it prescribes.

§ 3907.
Memorial Day and other historic events.

A municipality may appropriate such sums of money as it deems necessary for the proper observance of Memorial Day, for the celebration of historic events, and for the erection and dedication of monuments or tablets to commemorate the same.